Massachusetts, session 194th, H1596.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the trial court of the 
commonwealth shall establish a sick leave bank for Ana C. Contreras, an employee of the trial 
court. Any employee of the trial court may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal, or 
vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Ana C. Contreras. If Ana C. Contreras terminates 
employment with the trial court or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time 
in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the trial court paid leave bank. Sick leave bank days 
shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the 
establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the trial court.